Hawaii statutes.
[§321‑1.65] Community health centers
special fund. (a) There is established within the state treasury a
special fund to be known as the community health centers special fund to be
administered and expended by the department of health.

(b) The moneys in the special fund shall be
used by the department of health for the operations of federally qualified
health centers.

(c) Moneys collected pursuant to section
245-15 shall be deposited into the special fund. [L 2006, c 316, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next